Utah statutes.
26-6b-10.   Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance, is found to be unconstitutional, the provision is severable and the balance of this chapter remains effective, notwithstanding that unconstitutionality.



Enacted by Chapter 211, 1996 General Session

